Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE M. REGULATION OF OTHER HEALTH PROFESSIONS

CHAPTER 701. DIETITIANS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 701.001. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be cited as the Licensed Dietitian Act.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 701.002. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Advisory board" means the Dietitians Advisory Board.

(1-a) "Commission" means the Texas Commission of Licensing and Regulation.

(2) "Department" means the Texas Department of Licensing and Regulation.

(3) "Dietetics" means the professional discipline of applying and integrating scientific principles of food, nutrition, biochemistry, physiology, management, and behavioral and social sciences under different health, social, cultural, physical, psychological, and economic conditions for the proper nourishment, care, and education of an individual or group throughout the life cycle to achieve and maintain human health. The term includes the development, management, and provision of nutrition services.

(4) "Executive director" means the executive director of the department.

(5) "Licensed dietitian" means a person licensed under this chapter.

(6) "Nutrition assessment" means evaluating the nutritional needs of an individual or group based on appropriate biochemical, anthropometric, physical, and dietary data to determine nutrient needs and recommend appropriate nutritional intake, including enteral and parenteral nutrition.

(7) "Nutrition counseling" means advising and assisting an individual or group on appropriate nutritional intake by integrating information from a nutrition assessment with information on food and other sources of nutrients and meal preparation consistent with cultural background and socioeconomic status.

(8) "Nutrition services" means:

(A) assessing the nutritional needs of an individual or group and determining constraints and resources in the practice;

(B) establishing priorities and goals that meet nutritional needs and are consistent with constraints and available resources;

(C) providing nutrition counseling in health and disease;

(D) developing, implementing, and managing nutritional care systems; or

(E) evaluating, changing, and maintaining appropriate quality standards in food and nutritional care services.

(9) "Provisional licensed dietitian" means a person provisionally licensed under this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 147 (H.B. 1155), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.191, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER B. DIETITIANS ADVISORY BOARD

Sec. 701.051. DIETITIANS ADVISORY BOARD MEMBERSHIP. (a) The advisory board consists of nine members appointed by the presiding officer of the commission with the approval of the commission as follows:

(1) six licensed dietitian members, each of whom has been licensed under this chapter for not less than three years before the member's date of appointment; and

(2) three members who represent the public.

(b) In appointing dietitian members to the advisory board, the presiding officer of the commission shall attempt to maintain balanced representation among the following primary areas of expertise included in the professional discipline of dietetics:

(1) clinical;

(2) educational;

(3) management;

(4) consultation; and

(5) community.

(c) Appointments to the advisory board shall be made without regard to the race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin of the appointee.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.193, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 701.0511. DUTIES OF ADVISORY BOARD. The advisory board shall provide advice and recommendations to the department on technical matters relevant to the administration of this chapter.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.194, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 701.054. TERMS; VACANCIES. (a) Members of the advisory board serve staggered six-year terms. The terms of three members begin on September 1 of each odd-numbered year.

(b) If a vacancy occurs during a member's term, the presiding officer of the commission, with the commission's approval, shall appoint a replacement who meets the qualifications for the vacant position to serve for the remainder of the term.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.195, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 701.057. PRESIDING OFFICER. The presiding officer of the commission shall designate a member of the advisory board as the presiding officer of the advisory board to serve for a term of one year. The presiding officer of the advisory board may vote on any matter before the advisory board.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 147 (H.B. 1155), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.196, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 701.058. MEETINGS. The advisory board shall meet at the call of the presiding officer of the commission or the executive director.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.197, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER D. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 701.151. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. (a) The executive director shall administer and enforce this chapter.

(b) The commission or the department, as appropriate, shall:

(1) adopt and publish a code of ethics;

(2) establish the qualifications and fitness of applicants for licenses, including renewed and reciprocal licenses; and

(3) request and receive any necessary assistance from state educational institutions or other state agencies.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.198, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1144 (H.B. 2847), Sec. 12.001, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 701.1511. REGISTRY. The department shall prepare a registry of licensed dietitians and provisional licensed dietitians and make the registry available to the public, license holders, and appropriate state agencies.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.199, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER F. LICENSE REQUIREMENTS

Sec. 701.251. LICENSE REQUIRED; COMMISSION REGISTRATION. (a) In this section, "Commission on Dietetic Registration" means the commission that is a member of the National Commission on Health Certifying Agencies.

(b) Unless the person holds an appropriate license issued under this chapter, a person may not:

(1) use the title or represent or imply that the person has the title "licensed dietitian" or "provisional licensed dietitian" or use the letters "LD" or "PLD"; or

(2) use a facsimile of those titles to indicate or imply that the person is a licensed dietitian or provisional licensed dietitian.

(c) Unless the person is a dietitian registered by the Commission on Dietetic Registration, a person may not:

(1) use the title or represent or imply that the person has the title "registered dietitian" or use the letters "RD"; or

(2) use a facsimile of that title to indicate or imply that the person is a dietitian registered by the Commission on Dietetic Registration.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 701.252. LICENSE APPLICATION. (a) Each applicant for a dietitian license must submit an application in the manner and on a form prescribed by the executive director accompanied by the application fee.

(b) The commission by rule shall determine the information and documentation required to be submitted as part of an application.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.205, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 701.253. LICENSE EXAMINATION. (a) In this section, "Commission on Dietetic Registration" has the meaning assigned by Section 701.251(a).

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (f), an applicant must pass a license examination to qualify for a license under this chapter.

(c) The department shall prepare or approve an examination. An examination prescribed by the department may be or may include an examination given by the Commission on Dietetic Registration or by a national or state testing service instead of an examination prepared by the department or the department's designee.

(d) Any written portion of the examination must be validated by an independent testing professional.

(e) The department shall administer an examination to qualified applicants at least twice each calendar year.

(f) The department shall waive the examination requirement for an applicant who, at the time of application, is a dietitian registered by the Commission on Dietetic Registration.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 147 (H.B. 1155), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 147 (H.B. 1155), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.206, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 701.254. QUALIFICATIONS FOR EXAMINATION. To qualify for the licensing examination under this chapter, an applicant must:

(1) possess a baccalaureate or postbaccalaureate degree, conferred by a college or university regionally accredited at the time of conferral, with:

(A) a major course of study in human nutrition, food and nutrition, nutrition education, dietetics, or food systems management; or

(B) an equivalent major course of study approved by the department; and

(2) have completed an internship or preplanned, documented, professional experience program in dietetics practice of not less than 900 hours under the supervision of a licensed dietitian or a registered dietitian approved by the department.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.207, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 701.2575. JURISPRUDENCE EXAMINATION. (a) The department shall develop and administer at least twice each calendar year a jurisprudence examination to determine an applicant's knowledge of this chapter, commission rules under this chapter, and any other applicable laws of this state affecting the applicant's dietetics practice.

(b) In addition to the license examination required by Section 701.253, an applicant must pass a jurisprudence examination to qualify for a license under this chapter.

(c) The commission shall adopt rules to implement this section, including rules related to the development and administration of the examination, examination fees, guidelines for reexamination, grading the examination, and providing notice of examination results.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 147 (H.B. 1155), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.209, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 701.258. QUALIFIED PERSON ENTITLED TO LICENSE. The department shall issue a license as a licensed dietitian to a person qualified for a license under this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.210, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER G. LICENSE RENEWAL

Sec. 701.301. LICENSE RENEWAL. (a) A license is valid for two years after the date of issuance and may be renewed biennially.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 1.222(208), eff. September 1, 2015.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 1.222(208), eff. September 1, 2015.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 1.222(208), eff. September 1, 2015.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 1.222(208), eff. September 1, 2015.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 1.222(208), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 147 (H.B. 1155), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 5.222, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.222(208), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 701.304. GROUNDS FOR REFUSING RENEWAL. The commission or department may refuse to renew the license of a person who fails to pay an administrative penalty imposed under Subchapter K, unless enforcement of the penalty is stayed or a court has ordered that the administrative penalty is not owed.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 147 (H.B. 1155), Sec. 21, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.214, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER H. PRACTICE BY LICENSE HOLDER

Sec. 701.351. DISPLAY OF LICENSE. (a) A license holder shall display the person's license in an appropriate and public manner as prescribed by commission rule.

(b) A license issued by the department is the property of the department and shall be surrendered on demand.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.215, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 701.352. LICENSE HOLDER INFORMATION. A license holder shall keep the department informed of the license holder's current address as provided by commission rule.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.216, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER I. DISCIPLINARY PROCEDURES

Sec. 701.401. GROUNDS FOR DISCIPLINARY ACTION. The commission or executive director shall refuse to renew a license, revoke or suspend a license, place on probation a person whose license has been suspended, or reprimand a license holder for a violation of this chapter, a rule or code of ethics adopted under this chapter, or an order of the commission or executive director.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 147 (H.B. 1155), Sec. 22, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.218, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 701.403. SANCTIONS. The State Office of Administrative Hearings shall use the schedule of sanctions adopted by the commission by rule for a sanction imposed as the result of a hearing conducted by the office.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 1.219, eff. September 1, 2015.